Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1080.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1703-A(b) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1703-A. Disposition of Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund.* * *(b) Appropriation.--Except as provided under [subsection (c)] subsections (c) and (d), whenever the Governor determines that an appropriation from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund is necessary to meet emergencies involving the health, safety or welfare of the residents of this Commonwealth or to counterbalance downturns of the economy which result in significant unanticipated revenue shortfalls, the Governor shall present a request for an appropriation which may include the specifics of the proposal and suggested ancillary and substantive legislation as may be necessary to the chairman of Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairman of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives. The General Assembly may then through approval of a separate appropriation bill by a vote of two-thirds of the members elected to the Senate and the House of Representatives appropriate money from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund to meet the needs identified in the Governor's proposal. Any money appropriated according to this section which has then lapsed shall be returned to the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund.20250SB1080PN1302 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 * * *(d) SNAP benefits emergency transfer.--Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no later than November 1, 2025, $62,000,000 shall be transferred from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund as follows:(1) The sum of $50,000,000 shall be transferred to the Department of Agriculture for purposes of providing grants to food banks located in this Commonwealth to fund staff and operations and to purchase food and other necessities to ensure that each food bank has the resources necessary to respond to the needs of Pennsylvania families due to the loss of Federal SNAP benefits beginning on November 1, 2025. The Department of Agriculture shall administer funds received under this paragraph under the act of December 11, 1992 (P.L.807, No.129), known as the State Food Purchase Program Act, and the act of November 23, 2010 (P.L.1134, No.113), known as the Pennsylvania Agricultural Surplus System Act.(2) The sum of $10,000,000 shall be transferred to the Department of Human Services for grants to organizations that assist senior citizens in addressing hunger, food insecurity and isolation through wellness checks and delivery of nutritional meals.(3) The sum of $2,000,000 is transferred to the Department of Agriculture and the Department of Human Services for the administration of this subsection and for the advertisement of the availability of grants and the additional assistance available under this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1080PN1302 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728